Illinois, session 104th, HB2369.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-2c as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-2c new)7    Sec. 5-2c. Certified Family Health Aide Program.8    (a) As used in this Section: 9    "Home health agency", "home nursing agency", and "home 10services agency" have the same meaning ascribed to those terms 11under the Home Health, Home Services, and Home Nursing Agency 12Licensing Act. 13    "Legally responsible family caregiver or family member" 14mean a parent, guardian, or adult sibling, 18 years of age or 15older, of a household family member who receives or is 16eligible to receive in-home shift nursing services or in-home 17respite services under the Early and Periodic Screening, 18Diagnostic and Treatment benefit authorized under 42 CFR 19441.50 or through any home and community-based services waiver 20program for medically fragile and technology dependent 21children as authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social 22Security Act. 23    "Participating agency" means a home health agency, home   HB2369- 2 -LRB104 06022 KTG 16055 b1nursing agency, or home services agency that participates in 2the Certified Family Health Aide Program. 3    "Program" means the Certified Family Health Aide Program. 4    (b) By January 1, 2027, the Department shall establish and 5administer a Certified Family Health Aide Program that permits 6a legally responsible family caregiver or family member to 7receive specific training from a participating licensed home 8health agency, home nursing agency, or home services agency on 9the provision of private duty nursing services. A legally 10responsible family caregiver or family member who successfully 11completes training and meets all other applicable requirements 12under State or federal law shall receive certification as a 13certified family health aide and be eligible to provide 14private duty nursing services to a qualifying family member 15under the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic and 16Treatment benefit or through any home and community-based 17services waiver program for medically fragile and technology 18dependent children. No home health agency, home nursing 19agency, home services agency, or legally responsible family 20caregiver or family member is required to participate in the 21program.22    (c) To obtain certification as a family health aide under 23the program, a legally responsible family caregiver or family 24member must complete all training, testing, and other 25qualification criteria as prescribed by the Department, by 26rule, or as required under any applicable State or federal   HB2369- 3 -LRB104 06022 KTG 16055 b1law. Training provided by a participating agency must follow 2federal guidelines and standards on home health aide 3instruction and training as set forth in 42 CFR 484.80. All 4family health aides must complete training and instruction on 5the following tasks: 6        (1) patient care transfers;7        (2) positioning;8        (3) ambulation;9        (4) feeding;10        (5) personal 24 care;11        (6) catheter care;12        (7) range of motion;13        (8) observation and reporting of a patient's vital 14    signs and blood pressure;15        (9) medication administration;16        (10) enteral care; and17        (11) meal and formula preparation. 18    A participating agency must provide an additional 10 hours 19of hands-on training in the tasks described in paragraphs (1) 20through (11). All training and instruction provided by a 21participating agency must be documented by the participating 22agency. Each of tasks described in paragraphs (1) through (11) 23shall be within the scope of practice for certified family 24health aides.25    (d) Certified family health aides must meet all competency 26requirements imposed by the participating agency, as well as   HB2369- 4 -LRB104 06022 KTG 16055 b1applicable State and federal guidelines, before providing 2private duty nursing services to a family member who is 3receiving medical assistance under the Early and Periodic 4Screening, Diagnostic and Treatment benefit or through any 5home and community-based services waiver program for medically 6fragile and technology dependent children. A participating 7agency that employs a legally responsible family caregiver or 8family member prior to certification shall be required to pay 9all training costs for the legally responsible family 10caregiver or family member to become a certified family health 11aide. No legally responsible family caregiver or family member 12shall be required to reimburse the participating agency for 13the training costs associated with certification. A legally 14responsible family caregiver or family member must meet all 15applicable State and federal background screening requirements 16and regulations, including a fingerprint-based criminal 17history records check, to obtain employment at a participating 18agency.19    The Department shall adopt rules to implement the program, 20including, but not limited to, rules on application and 21certification requirements for legally responsible family 22caregivers or family members seeking to participate in the 23program. 24    (e) To qualify for certification as a certified family 25health aide, a legally responsible family caregiver or family 26member must at a minimum:  HB2369- 5 -LRB104 06022 KTG 16055 b1        (1) be at least 18 years of age or older; and 2        (2) have satisfactorily completed 3    participant-specific training and received a sign-off 4    indicating competency in the provision of care from a 5    supervising medical team and participating agency.6    A certified family health aide may only provide care to 7the specific family member for whom the certified family 8health aide is trained to provide care. The certified family 9health aide may provide private duty nursing services to that 10family member if the certified family health aide is the only 11family member present in the home at the time of service 12delivery. Certified family health aides may not provide 13services to persons other than family members who are eligible 14for medical assistance under the Early and Periodic Screening, 15Diagnostic and Treatment benefit or through any home and 16community-based services waiver program for medically fragile 17and technology dependent children. Certified family health 18aides may not provide services in any health care setting 19other than a home nursing model. 20    (f) The reimbursement rate for home health agencies, home 21nursing agencies, and home services agencies that provide 22certified family health aide services shall be no lower than 23$40.00 an hour. 24    (g) Beginning 30 days after the effective date of this 25amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and until the 26Certified Family Health Aide Program is implemented, the   HB2369- 6 -LRB104 06022 KTG 16055 b1Department shall meet and work with home health agencies, home 2nursing agencies, and home services agencies on a monthly 3basis during the development and implementation phase of the 4program. 5    (h) No later than 3 years after the implementation date of 6the program, the Department shall prepare and submit a report 7to the Governor and the General Assembly concerning the 8viability of the program and the Director's recommendations 9concerning the program. The Department shall use its data and 10not that of any home health agency, home nursing agency, or 11home services agency participating in the program. 12    (i) The Department shall permanently establish a committee 13and meet together at least quarterly with home health 14agencies, home nursing agencies, and home services agencies, 15family health aides and their families, and other members of 16the public to make comments or ask questions regarding the 17private duty nursing benefit servicing program participants 18under the State Plan's Early and Periodic Screening, 19Diagnostic, and Treatment program or the Medically Fragile, 20Technology Dependent waiver.  21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.